src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s10_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - elgja: # 
    elgja+V+Inf: elgja
    elgja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: elgir
    elgja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: elgdi
    elgja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: elgdu
    elgja+V+Sup: elgt
    elgja+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: elgdur

  Verb - belgja: # 
    belgja+V+Inf: belgja
    belgja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: belgir
    belgja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: belgdi
    belgja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: belgdu
    belgja+V+Sup: belgt
    belgja+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: belgdur
